Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 2

Advertising and Tourist Promotion

5-9-201. Legislative declaration — Appropriations for advertising authorized.

Advertising the commercial, social, agricultural, industrial, scenic, recreational, historical, educational and other advantages, the points of interest and attractions within the various counties of Tennessee, and tourist promotion generally are declared to be a county purpose.

The county legislative body or other governing body of each county is authorized and empowered in its discretion to appropriate moneys from the general funds of such county for the purpose of advertising the commercial, social, agricultural, industrial, scenic, recreational, historical, educational and other advantages of such county, and the points of interest and attractions therein, for tourist promotion.

Acts 1941, ch. 21, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 10250.1, 10250.2 (Williams, §§ 844.1, 844.2); Acts 1968, ch. 474, § 1; 1977, ch. 55, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-906.

Attorney General Opinions. Under Chapter 905 of the Public Acts of 1980, as amended by Chapter 444 of the Public Acts of 1983 and Chapter 918 of the Public Acts of 1988, a county has discretion to appropriate hotel-motel tax revenues for the purpose of promoting tourism to a Convention Visitors Bureau or to a Tourist Development Agency. OAG 18-24, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 23 (6/1/2018).

5-9-202. Control of expenditures.

The funds appropriated pursuant to authority vested in the various county legislative bodies or governing bodies of counties in § 5-9-201 shall be used and expended under the direction and control of the county legislative bodies so appropriating the funds, or through such agency or agencies as they shall prescribe, and under such rules and regulations as they see fit.

Acts 1941, ch. 21, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 10250.3 (Williams, § 844.3); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-907.

Attorney General Opinions. Under Chapter 905 of the Public Acts of 1980, as amended by Chapter 444 of the Public Acts of 1983 and Chapter 918 of the Public Acts of 1988, a county has discretion to appropriate hotel-motel tax revenues for the purpose of promoting tourism to a Convention Visitors Bureau or to a Tourist Development Agency. OAG 18-24, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 23 (6/1/2018).

5-9-203. Related county powers.

To carry out the purpose and intent of this part, the counties are authorized and empowered to:

Form contracts with agencies of any type or wherever situated that will tend to promote the objectives of advertising the advantages of the various counties of this state;

Gather and compile information from branches of the state government and other sources that will promote authentic information for advertising purposes;

Enter into cooperative agreements and contracts with such individuals, partnerships, corporations, public and private associations, societies, educational institutions, chambers of commerce, tourist bureaus, automobile associations or any other organized groups as may be deemed advantageous to carry out the intent and purposes of this part;

Accept unconditional gifts of money to be expended in furtherance of the purposes set out in § 5-9-201;

Within the limits of available funds, match the money advanced for the purposes of this part, by the federal government, or by any state, county, municipal corporation, association, society or individual; and

Donate, contribute or give all or any part of the funds so appropriated to such organized associations, societies, tourist bureaus or chambers of commerce, or corporations located within the territorial limits of such county, as may be deemed advantageous and proper to effectuate the purposes and intent of this part.

Acts 1941, ch. 21, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 10250.4 (Williams, § 844.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-908.